Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXV Domestic Relations
CHAPTER 401 Change of Name

401.010.
Adult may have name changed by District Court.

Any person at least eighteen (18) years of age may have his or her name changed by the District Court of the county in which he or she resides. If he or she resides on a United States Army post, military reservation, or fort, his or her name may be changed by the District Court of any county adjacent thereto.

History.

3717: amend. Acts 1964, ch. 155, § 1; 1968, ch. 100, § 12; 1968, ch. 200, § 9; 1974, ch. 66, § 1; 1974, ch. 386, § 88; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 395, effective January 2, 1978; 2013, ch. 89, § 1, effective March 22, 2013.

401.020.
Parents or guardian may have child’s name changed in District, Family, or Circuit Court.

Both parents, provided both are living, or one (1) parent if one (1) is deceased, or if no parent is living, the guardian, may have the name of a child under the age of eighteen (18) changed by the District Court, or if the Family Court or Circuit Court has a case before it involving the family, the Family Court of a county with a Family Court, or the Circuit Court of a county without a Family Court of the county in which the child resides. However, if one (1) parent refuses or is unavailable to execute the petition, proper notice of filing the petition shall be served in accordance with the Rules of Civil Procedure. If the child resides on a United States Army post, military reservation, or fort, his or her name may be changed by the District Court, or the Family Court of a county with a Family Court, or the Circuit Court of a county without a Family Court of any county adjacent thereto.

History.

3718: amend. Acts 1964, ch. 155, § 1; 1968, ch. 100, § 13; 1974, ch. 386, § 89; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 396, effective January 2, 1978; 1980, ch. 259, § 27, effective July 15, 1980; 2013, ch. 89, § 2, effective March 22, 2013.

401.030.
Information to be entered on order book of court.

The original name, age, and place of birth, the name to which the change is made, and the names of the infant’s father and mother, if known, and of the person on whose motion the change is made shall be entered on the order book of the District Court, Family Court, or Circuit Court in which the action was brought and is authorized to do so pursuant to KRS

401.020

.

History.

3719: amend. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 397, effective January 2, 1978; 2013, ch. 89, § 3, effective March 22, 2013.

401.040.
Certification of order for name change — Index kept by county clerk.

If the District Court, Family Court, or Circuit Court, as authorized by KRS

401.020

, orders any person’s name to be changed under this chapter, a copy of the order shall be certified by the clerk of that court to the county clerk, for record.

The county clerk shall keep an alphabetical index for each book of records, referring to the page on which each person’s name change appears, and giving the name from and to which it is changed.

History.

3720: amend. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 398, effective January 2, 1978; 2013, ch. 89, § 4, effective March 22, 2013.